Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.181

Powers and duties of director.

The director shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) To issue all licenses provided for under this chapter;

(2) To renew licenses under this chapter;

(3) To collect all fees prescribed and required under this chapter;

(4) To immediately suspend the license of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order;

(5) To keep records of all official acts, proceedings, and transactions of the department of licensing; and

(6) To employ the necessary staff to carry out the duties of this chapter.

[ 2005 c 365 s 15; 1997 c 58 s 819; 1996 c 217 s 7; 1986 c 259 s 65; 1981 c 43 s 13; 1977 ex.s. c 93 s 5.]

NOTES:

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.